New York, session 2025-2026, A79.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 15-148 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York, as added by local law number 60 of the city of 3 New York for the year 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. The commissioner shall provide body armor to all employees of the 5 department within the bureau of emergency medical services who provide 6 emergency medical services. Such body armor shall be of the type that 7 the commissioner determines would be most suitable for the protection of 8 such employees, and shall meet ballistic and stab resistance standards 9 of the national institute of justice or any successor standards. Such 10 body armor shall be replaced every five years. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00003-01-5